Utah statutes.
78B-1-114.   Jury fee assessments -- Payment.

(1)  The court has discretionary authority in any civil or criminal action or proceeding triable by jury to assess the entire cost of one day's juror fees against either the plaintiff or defendant or their counsel, or to divide the cost and assess them against both plaintiff and defendant or their counsel, or additional parties plaintiff or defendant, if:

(a)  a jury demand has been made and is later withdrawn within the 48 hours preceding the commencement of the trial; or

(b)  the case is settled or continued within 48 hours of trial without just cause for not having settled or continued the case prior to the 48-hour period.

(2)  The party assessed shall make payment to the clerk of the court within a prescribed period.  Payment shall be enforced by contempt proceedings.

(3)  The court clerk shall transfer the assessment to the state treasury, or the auditor of the city or county incurring the juror expenses.

